Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-921
Registered voter; occupancy and time restrictions.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of section 32-918, no registered voter shall be allowed to occupy a voting booth occupied by another. A registered voter shall not remain within the enclosure in which the voting booths are situated more than twenty minutes unless he or she is in line waiting to vote or voting. A registered voter shall not occupy a voting booth for more than ten minutes.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 264;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 28;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 39.